Hawaii statutes.
[§124A-114] Conviction of lesser included
offense. An accused may be found guilty of an offense necessarily included
in the offense charged or of an attempt to commit either the offense charged or
an offense necessarily included therein. [L 1982, c 171, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol03_Ch0121-0200D
Next